apertium-en-it.it.dix
    <pardef n="/riscuotere__vblex">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuoteremmo</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuoterei</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuotereste</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuoteresti</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>riscuoterebber</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuoterebbero</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuoterebbe</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuoteremo</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuoterò</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuoterete</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuoterai</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>riscuoteran</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuoteranno</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuoterà</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cotevo</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuotevo</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cotevo</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
	</p><par n="S__cantando"/>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuotevo</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
	</p><par n="S__cantando"/>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cotemmo</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuotemmo</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscossi</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>coteste</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuoteste</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cotesti</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuotesti</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>riscosser</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscossero</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscosse</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cotiamo</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuotiamo</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cotete</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuotiamo</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuoti</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>riscuotan</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuotano</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuota</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>riscuoter</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuotere</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuoter</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
	</p><par n="S__cantar"/>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cotevamo</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuotevamo</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cotevo</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuotevo</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cotevate</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuotevate</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cotevi</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuotevi</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cotevano</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuotevano</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>coteva</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuoteva</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cotessimo</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuotessimo</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cotessi</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuotessi</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>coteste</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuoteste</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cotessi</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuotessi</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cotessero</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuotessero</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cotesse</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscuotesse</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscosse</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscossa</l>
	  <r>riscuotere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riscossi</l>

    <e lm="riscuotere"><par n="/riscuotere__vblex"/></e>
